cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX B Y 863
SFX B 0 сем/P .
SFX B 0 /RT .
SFX B 0 ӗн/RT [^еӗӳэи]
SFX B ь ӗн/RT ь
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B 0 н/RT е
SFX B 0 е/RT [^еӗӳэи]
SFX B ь е/RT ь
SFX B ӳ ӗве/RT ӳ
SFX B 0 не/RT е
SFX B 0 не/RT и
SFX B 0 ре/RT [^аоьлнр]
SFX B 0 ре/RT [^лнр]ь
SFX B 0 те/RT [лнр]ь
SFX B 0 те/RT [лнр]
SFX B 0 ти/RT [лнр]
SFX B 0 ри/RT [^лнр]
SFX B 0 рен/RT [^аоьлнр]
SFX B 0 рен/RT [^лнр]ь
SFX B 0 тен/RT [лнр]ь
SFX B 0 тен/RT [лнр]
SFX B 0 пе/RT [^ь]
SFX B 0 пе/RT ь
SFX B 0 сӗр/RT [^ь]
SFX B 0 сӗр/RT ь
SFX B 0 шӗн/RT [^ь]
SFX B 0 шӗн/RT ь
SFX B 0 ӗм/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмсем/P [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗр/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗрсем/P [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 м/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗр/RT е
SFX B 0 мсем/P е
SFX B 0 мӗрсем/P е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗм/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмсем/P ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗрсем/P ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗм/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 м/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗр/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мсем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗрсем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗм/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмсем/P и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗр/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗрсем/P и
SFX B 0 ӳ/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗр/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӳсем/P [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗрсем/P [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳ/RT е
SFX B е ӗр/RT е
SFX B е ӳсем/P е
SFX B е ӗрсем/P е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳ/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳсем/P ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗрсем/P ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳ/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗрсем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳ/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 р/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳсем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 рсем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳ/RT и
SFX B 0 йӳсем/P и
SFX B 0 йӗр/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗрсем/P и
SFX B 0 ӗ/RT [^еӗиӳт]
SFX B т чӗ/RT т
SFX B 0 ӗсем/P [^еӗиӳт]
SFX B т чӗсем/P т
SFX B е и/RT е
SFX B е исем/P е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗ/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗсем/P ӳ
SFX B ӗ ви/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ ки/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ ли/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ ми/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ ни/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ ри/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ си/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ и/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ ти/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ ши/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ висем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ писем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ исем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шисем/P [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ и/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B ӗ исем/P [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗ/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗсем/P и
SFX B 0 ӗмӗн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗрӗн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 мӗн/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗрӗн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗрӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 мӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗрӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗмӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗрӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗрӗн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳн/RT е
SFX B е ӗрӗн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗрӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
