cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
Ҫӳҫмет/B
ҫӗнтерӳ/B
ҫемье/B
ҫукки/B
ҫӳрекен/B
ӗҫҫынни/B
ӗҫлевҫӗ/B
ӗлӗш/B
ӗмӗтҫӗ/B
ӗнӗҫ/B
ӗнентерӳ/B
ӗнери/B
ӗревӗҫ/B
ӗрех/B
ӗрчевсӗр/FB
ӗшкев/B
Аванти/B
Акаҫҫи/B
Али/B
Алякки/B
Андрей/B
Артемий/B
Ахмет/B
Белорусси/B
Браззавиль/B
Вӑрманкасси/B
Варпикке/B
Велит/B
Виргини/B
Гомель/B
Джорджи/B
Еврази/B
Елев/B
Емин/B
Ентимӗр/B
Ерне/B
Ехмет/B
Залесский/B
Иҫти/B
Илетер/B
Илментей/B
Илтепхин/B
Илчевер/B
Индонези/B
Иртеш/B
Исмаил/B
Итрис/B
Йӗппи/B
Кӗлсере/B
Кӗнечей/B
Кали/B
Камите/B
Кастили/B
Келмет/B
Кисами/B
Константинополь/B
Лапланди/B
Лилль/B
Мӑххит/B
Маҫҫи/B
Малишке/B
Марйе/B
Матйен/B
Мелитополь/B
Меркури/B
Микетер/B
Миней/B
Минпикке/B
Миххи/B
Монголи/B
Мулли/B
Неаполь/B
Норвеги/B
Осети/B
Паймет/B
Пархантей/B
Пахит/B
Петмет/B
Пикки/B
Пинеҫ/B
Пинерчен/B
Пинешле/B
Питментей/B
Пиш/B
Пошехонье/B
Прикарпатье/B
Пуркки/B
Ристем/B
Сӑрпик/B
Сӗлпикке/B
Саватер/B
Савин/B
Савнелӗ/B
Саврантей/B
Саихве/B
Санихер/B
Сарине/B
Сатни/B
Сахите/B
Севентей/B
Сенетер/B
Сентирек/B
Сергей/B
Серпине/B
Сетиме/B
Силантий/B
Силкипе/B
Силтер/B
Симми/B
Синтевер/B
Ситийер/B
Словаки/B
Ставрополье/B
Тӑхтапи/B
Тайихве/B
Таптик/B
Теветпи/B
Тементей/B
Тетте/B
Тиментей/B
Тойте/B
Туймеҫ/B
Туйсевӗр/B
Туркмени/B
Тухтилет/B
Уканеш/B
Ултирек/B
Унеспи/B
Усолье/B
Ухантилет/B
Ухтимӗр/B
Френель/B
Хӗрмитон/B
Хӗрчеппи/B
Хампик/B
Хертик/B
Хуньтимӗр/B
Чехи/B
Шевер/B
Шеневер/B
Шерине/B
Шерпике/B
Шеххи/B
Элекей/B
Элккей/B
Элпикке/B
Энтип/B
Эпти/B
Эрнепи/B
Эссепе/B
Эхмет/B
Ялтти/B
Яштирек/B
авиакомпани/B
автоматизаци/B
агони/B
агрохими/B
акклиматизаци/B
алиби/B
алшӑлли/B
ампутаци/B
анатоми/B
аномали/B
аншарли/B
апробаци/B
арлаҫҫи/B
асанне/B
асли/B
астронавигаци/B
аттестаци/B
аэрофотографи/B
библи/B
биохими/B
букварь/B
вӑнпӳ/B
вӗҫенчӗк/B
вӗҫленӳ/B
вӗлтӗренлӗх/B
вӗрентӳ/B
вӗрлӗк/B
вӗтӗлти/B
вӗтлем/B
вӗчӗхӳ/B
валинкке/B
ватерлини/B
вере/B
вестибюль/B
виҫев/B
виктори/B
вилеслӗх/B
вирт/B
витӗмсӗр/CB
витлев/B
водевиль/B
вуаль/B
выпрямитель/B
гантель/B
гели/B
геохими/B
гидроэлектростанци/B
глазурь/B
госпиталь/B
двигатель/B
дезинсекци/B
деклараци/B
демаркаци/B
дендрари/B
деятель/B
дикци/B
дискусси/B
дистилляци/B
дознани/B
дрель/B
евӗрлев/B
ейӳ/B
енккӗ/B
епрешке/B
естествознани/B
ешерлӗх/B
жюри/B
заместитель/B
зооветеринари/B
идеологи/B
издатель/B
икӗпитлӗх/B
икьенлӗх/B
илемлетӳ/B
иллюминаци/B
именӳ/B
имшерлӗх/B
инвестици/B
инерци/B
инстанци/B
интернационализаци/B
информатизаци/B
ир/B
ирӗм/B
иртекен/B
истери/B
ишкӗч/B
йӑнкӑрти/B
йӗкӗлти/B
йӗккен/B
йӗлмелӗх/B
йӗнерҫӗ/B
йӗпхӳ/B
йӗрӗх/B
йӗрлешӳ/B
йӗтем/B
йӳҫҫи/B
йӳнеҫӳ/B
йӳтетмӗш/B
кӑчӑрти/B
кӗвӗ/B
кӗвсе/B
кӗлевӗҫ/B
кӗлмӗҫ/B
кӗмсертетӳ/B
кӗр/BV
кӗрептук/B
кӗрмек/B
кӗслеҫ/B
кӗтрет/B
кавлев/B
каллиграфи/B
кампанилӗх/B
каракуль/B
кастрюль/B
кепе/B
килӗшни/B
кимӗҫ/B
кипек/B
кисренӳ/B
клеще/B
коллизи/B
компетенци/B
конспираци/B
конфиденци/B
коррупци/B
кристаллографи/B
куманне/B
кушилкке/B
кӳптӗрме/B
лӑпӑсти/B
лакӑрти/B
лезви/B
лешинке/B
лоци/B
мӑчӑлти/B
мӗштӗркке/B
матӗр/B
мел/B
мерекке/B
метрополи/B
милӗк/B
мисси/B
монографи/B
мурилли/B
наклонени/B
нейтрализаци/B
нимеке/B
обмундировани/B
операци/B
отоларингологи/B
пӗкӗ/B
пӗлӳ/B
пӗрлӗхен/B
пӗрчӗк/B
пӗтмӗш/B
паразитологи/B
патрици/B
перекет/B
печени/B
пие/B
пиктографи/B
пирчен/B
пичче/B
политинформаци/B
почвоведени/B
привилеги/B
пропорцилӗх/B
пулӑшни/B
пурӑнаканни/B
пӳ/B
пӳрнеске/B
радиоизлучени/B
ратне/B
регламентаци/B
ремилитаризаци/B
рехет/B
сӗлӗ/B
сӗрелте/GB
садик/B
сведени/B
сентел/GB
сехмет/B
сикмӗрчӗк/B
симметрисӗрлӗх/B
сирпӗнчӗк/B
снабжени/B
спелеологи/B
стереотипи/B
субстантиваци/B
сухари/B
сӳрӗлчӗк/B
тӑрӑнти/B
тӗлӗнтермӗш/B
тӗн/B
тӗпчӗк/B
тӗрек/FB
тӗрмешӳ/B
тӗшмӗш/B
теветкел/B
тенешкел/B
терци/B
тиек/B
тимсӗрлӗх/B
тирӗм/B
тишкерӳ/B
трансплантаци/B
тытни/B
тӳпелешӳ/B
тӳсӗмсӗр/B
уложени/B
услови/B
фацели/B
филумени/B
фразеологи/B
хӗвел/B
хӗрӗп/B
хӗрӳ/B
хасине/B
хинди/B
хитрелӗх/B
хӳме/B
цикори/B
чӗкеҫ/B
чӗлхесӗр/B
чӗрӗлти/B
чӗрне/B
чейӗр/B
черкке/B
чикӗсӗр/B
чӳк/B
шӑхличӗ/B
шакӑлти/B
шепен/B
шик/B
шурути/B
ыхрути/B
экспрессилӗх/B
электроснабжени/B
эмоцилӗх/B
эптер/B
эрчемес/B
юплев/B
ӳкӗнӳ/B
ӳпкевлӗх/B
ӳсӗмлӗх/B
